Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.096

Life sciences discovery fund authority—Personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, this chapter does not apply to employees of the life sciences discovery fund authority under *chapter 43.350 RCW.

[ 2005 c 424 s 14.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 43.350 RCW was repealed and/or recodified by 2019 c 83 ss 5 and 6.